Utah statutes.
34-34-10.   Employer not to require payment of dues, fees, or other charges
to union.
No employer shall require any person to pay any dues, fees, or other charges
of any kind to any labor union, labor organization or any other type of
association as a condition of employment or continuation of employment.
